Florida, session 2026, SB950.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 817.101, Florida Statutes, is created to 17 read: 18 817.101âFinancial Crimes Intelligence Center.â 19 (1)âDEFINITION.âAs used in this section, the term 20 âdepartmentâ means the Department of Legal Affairs. 21 (2)âESTABLISHED.âThe Financial Crimes Intelligence Center 22 is established within the department. 23 (3)âPURPOSE.âThe purposes of the center are: 24 (a)âTo serve as the stateâs primary entity responsible for 25 the planning, coordination, and integration of law enforcement 26 agencies and other governmental agencies that respond to 27 criminal activity related to: 28 1.âFraud and fraudulent practices under this part and part 29 II of this chapter; 30 2.âForgery and counterfeiting under chapter 831; and 31 3.âCheck and payment fraud under chapter 832. 32 (b)âTo maximize the ability of the department, of law 33 enforcement agencies, and of other governmental agencies to 34 detect, prevent, and respond to criminal activities related to 35 financial fraud. 36 (4)âOPERATION AGREEMENTS AUTHORIZED; DIRECTOR.â 37 (a)âThe department: 38 1.âMay enter into agreements with law enforcement agencies 39 or other governmental agencies for the operation of the center; 40 and 41 2.âShall enter into an agreement with a law enforcement 42 agency or other governmental agency to appoint a director to 43 supervise and manage the operations of the center. 44 (b)âThe director may be a licensed attorney or law 45 enforcement officer. The agreement must provide that the 46 commission of a director who is a licensed law enforcement 47 officer will be carried by the agency with which the department 48 enters into the agreement. 49 (c)âAny information that a law enforcement agency or other 50 governmental agency collects and maintains under an agreement 51 entered into with the department under this chapter is the 52 intellectual property of the center. On termination of the 53 agreement, the contracting agency must transfer the information 54 to the department in accordance with the terms of the agreement. 55 (5)âPOWERS AND DUTIES.â 56 (a)âThe center may collaborate with federal, state, and 57 local governmental agencies to accomplish the purposes of the 58 center. 59 (b)âThe center shall assist law enforcement agencies, other 60 governmental agencies, financial institutions, credit card 61 issuers, debit card issuers, payment card networks, institutions 62 of higher education, and merchants in their efforts to develop 63 and implement strategies for identifying and prosecuting 64 financial crimes. 65 (c)âThe center may: 66 1.âServe as a centralized collection point for information 67 related to payment fraud; 68 2.âProvide training and educational opportunities to law 69 enforcement agencies; 70 3.âProvide outreach to the public; and 71 4.âRelease information to affected financial institutions, 72 credit card issuers, debit card issuers, payment card networks, 73 institutions of higher education, and merchants if the center 74 does not deem the information to be sensitive to law 75 enforcement. Information is deemed sensitive to law enforcement 76 if the information could cause harm to law enforcement 77 activities or jeopardize an investigation or operation if 78 disclosed. 79 (6)âANNUAL REPORT.â 80 (a)âBy December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the 81 director of the center shall submit a report to the department. 82 (b)âThe report must include all of the following: 83 1.âA plan of operation for the center and an estimate of 84 the moneys necessary to implement that plan. 85 2.âAn assessment of the current state of payment financial 86 fraud in this state, including: 87 a.âAn identification of the geographic locations in this 88 state which have the highest statistical probability for 89 financial fraud; and 90 b.âA summary of financial fraud statistics for the year in 91 which the report is filed. 92 3.âA detailed plan of operation for combatting financial 93 fraud. 94 4.âA communications plan for outreach to law enforcement 95 agencies, financial institutions, credit card issuers, debit 96 card issuers, payment card networks, merchants, and the public. 97 5.âA list of expenditures made since the most recent report 98 was filed with the department. 99 (7)âRULES.âThe department shall adopt rules to implement 100 and administer this section. 101 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.